South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3415.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 3, Title 53 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 53-3-320.  June twenty-second of each year, the date on which Sarah Mae Flemming challenged segregation on city buses in Columbia, South Carolina, is declared to be "Sarah Mae Flemming Day" in South Carolina. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----